Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2113
Independent mental health practice, defined.

(1) Independent mental health practice means the provision of treatment, assessment, psychotherapy, counseling, or equivalent activities to individuals, couples, families, or groups for behavioral, cognitive, social, mental, or emotional disorders, including interpersonal or personal situations.

(2) Independent mental health practice includes diagnosing major mental illness or disorder, using psychotherapy with individuals suspected of having major mental or emotional disorders, or using psychotherapy to treat the concomitants of organic illness, with or without consultation with a qualified physician or licensed psychologist.

(3) Independent mental health practice does not include the practice of psychology or medicine, prescribing drugs or electroconvulsive therapy, treating physical disease, injury, or deformity, or measuring personality or intelligence for the purpose of diagnosis or treatment planning.

Laws 2007, LB247, § 39;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,305.01.